Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB742.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2302(4) of Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2302. Policy.The General Assembly finds and declares that:* * *(4) It is in the best interest of the Commonwealth to establish a DNA data base and a DNA data bank containing DNA samples submitted by individuals convicted of, adjudicated delinquent for or accepted into ARD for felony sex offenses and other specified offenses of adults and of juveniles and containing DNA samples collected as part of an investigation 12345678910111213141516171819 into missing persons or unidentified decedents.* * *Section 2. The definition of "other specified offense" in section 2303 of Title 44 is amended and the section is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 2303. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Other specified offense of an adult." Any of the following:(1) A felony offense, other than a felony sex offense.(2) (Reserved).(3) (Reserved).(4) An offense under 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses) or 75 Pa.C.S. (relating to vehicles) that is graded as a misdemeanor of the first degree.(5) A misdemeanor offense requiring registration under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 97 Subch. H (relating to registration of sexual offenders).(6) An offense graded as a misdemeanor of the second degree under any of the following:18 Pa.C.S. § 2701 (relating to simple assault).18 Pa.C.S. § 2903 (relating to false imprisonment).18 Pa.C.S. § 3127 (relating to indecent exposure).18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 39 (relating to theft and related offenses). 18 Pa.C.S. § 4105 (relating to bad checks).18 Pa.C.S. § 4106 (relating to access device fraud).18 Pa.C.S. § 4952 (relating to intimidation of 20250HB0742PN0769 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 witnesses or victims).18 Pa.C.S. § 4953 (relating to retaliation against witness, victim or party).18 Pa.C.S. § 4958 (relating to intimidation, retaliation or obstruction in child abuse cases).18 Pa.C.S. § 5121 (relating to escape).18 Pa.C.S. § 5126 (relating to flight to avoid apprehension, trial or punishment).18 Pa.C.S. § 5131 (relating to recruiting criminal gang members).18 Pa.C.S. § 5510 (relating to abuse of corpse).18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 55 Subch. B (relating to cruelty to animals).18 Pa.C.S. § 5902 (relating to prostitution and related offenses)."Other specified offense of a juvenile." An offense under any of the following for which a juvenile has been tried as an adult or adjudicated delinquent:(1) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2502 (relating to murder).(2) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2503 (relating to voluntary manslaughter).(3) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2507 (relating to criminal homicide of law enforcement officer).(4) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702 (relating to aggravated assault).(5) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2702.1 (relating to assault of law enforcement officer).(6) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2707.1 (relating to discharge of a firearm into an occupied structure).(7) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2716 (relating to weapons of mass destruction).20250HB0742PN0769 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2717 (relating to terrorism).(9) 18 Pa.C.S. § 2718 (relating to strangulation).(10) A misdemeanor offense requiring registration under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 97 Subch. H.* * *Section 3. Sections 2316(a) introductory paragraph, (b) and (c) and 2316.1(a) of Title 44 are amended to read:§ 2316. DNA sample required upon conviction, delinquency adjudication and certain ARD cases.(a) [General rule] Collection.--A person who is convicted or adjudicated delinquent for a felony sex offense [or], other specified offense of an adult or other specified offense of a juvenile or who is or remains incarcerated for a felony sex offense [or], other specified offense of an adult or other specified offense of a juvenile on or after the effective date of this chapter shall have a DNA sample collected as follows:* * *(b) Condition of release, probation or parole.--(1) A person who has been convicted or adjudicated delinquent for a felony sex offense or other specified offense of an adult and who serves a term of confinement in connection therewith after June 18, 2002, shall not be released in any manner unless and until a DNA sample has been collected.(2) This chapter shall apply to incarcerated persons convicted or adjudicated delinquent for a felony sex offense or other specified offense of an adult prior to June 19, 2002.(3) The following shall apply:(i) Except as provided under subparagraph (ii), this 20250HB0742PN0769 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 chapter shall apply to incarcerated persons and persons on probation or parole who were convicted or adjudicated delinquent for a felony sex offense or other specified [offenses] offense of an adult prior to the effective date of this paragraph.(ii) Subparagraph (i) shall not apply to persons convicted or adjudicated delinquent of an offense enumerated under paragraph (4) or (6) of the definition of "other specified offense of an adult" in section 2303 (relating to definitions).(c) Certain ARD cases.--Acceptance into ARD as a result of a criminal charge for a felony sex offense or other specified offense of an adult, other than an offense enumerated under paragraph (4) or (6) of the definition of "other specified offense of an adult" in section 2303 filed after June 18, 2002, may be conditioned upon the collection of a DNA sample.* * *§ 2316.1. Collection from persons accepted from other jurisdictions.(a) Conditional acceptance.--When a person is accepted into this Commonwealth for supervision from another jurisdiction under the Interstate Compact for Supervision of Adult Offenders, other reciprocal agreement with a Federal, state or county agency, or a provision of law, whether or not the person is confined or released, the acceptance shall be conditioned on the offender providing a DNA sample under this chapter and fingerprints if the offender has a past or present Federal, state or military court conviction or adjudication that is equivalent to a felony sex offense or other specified offense of an adult as determined by the Pennsylvania Parole Board [of 20250HB0742PN0769 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Probation and Parole]. Additional DNA samples may be collected but shall not be required if the supervising agency or place of confinement confirms that a DNA sample is currently on file with the State DNA Data Bank and a DNA record for the person exists in the State DNA Data Base.* * *Section 4. Section 2321(c)(2) of Title 44 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2321. Expungement.* * *(a.1) Automatic expungement of juvenile record.--A DNA sample, record or profile of a juvenile that has been included in the State DNA Data Bank or the State DNA Data Base under the former DNA Act, former provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 47 or this chapter shall be automatically expunged at the time the applicable offense would be eligible for expungement.* * *(c) Limitations.--* * *(2) A person may not seek expungement of a DNA sample, record or profile on the ground that that person was convicted or adjudicated delinquent for [one of the other] another specified [offenses] offense of an adult prior to the effective date of the former DNA Act or this chapter.* * *Section 5. Section 2322 of Title 44 is amended to read:§ 2322. Mandatory cost.Unless the court finds that undue hardship would result, a mandatory cost of $250, which shall be in addition to any other costs imposed pursuant to statutory authority, shall 20250HB0742PN0769 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 automatically be assessed on any person convicted, adjudicated delinquent or granted ARD for a felony sex offense or other specified offense of an adult, and all proceeds derived from this section shall be transmitted to the fund.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0742PN0769 - 7 - 12345